test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VLONG_makomii_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     makomii: makomii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1makomii: nimakomii
     +Px2makomii: gimakomii
     +Px3makomii: omakomii
     +PxIndefmakomii: imakomii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     makomii+Dim: makomiiens
     makomii+Con: makomiienh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     makomii+Pos: makomiiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     makomii+Pej: makomiiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     makomii+Pos1Pl: makomiiinaan
     makomii+PosPl: makomiiiwaa
     makomii+PosObv: makomiiini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     makomii+Pret: makomiiiban
     makomii+VocPl: makomii***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     makomii+Obv: makomiian
     makomii+Pl: makomiiag
     makomii+Loc: makomiiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1makomii+Dim: nimakomiiens
     +Px1makomii+Con: nimakomiienh
     +Px2makomii+Dim: gimakomiiens
     +Px2makomii+Con: gimakomiienh
     +Px3makomii+Dim: omakomiiens
     +Px3makomii+Con: omakomiienh
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim: imakomiiens
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con: imakomiienh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1makomii+Pos: nimakomiiim
     +Px2makomii+Pos: gimakomiiim
     +Px3makomii+Pos: omakomiiim
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos: imakomiiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1makomii+Pej: nimakomiiish
     +Px2makomii+Pej: gimakomiiish
     +Px3makomii+Pej: omakomiiish
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pej: imakomiiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1makomii+Pos1Pl: nimakomiiinaan
     +Px1makomii+PosPl: nimakomiiiwaa
     +Px1makomii+PosObv: nimakomiiini
     +Px2makomii+Pos1Pl: gimakomiiinaan
     +Px2makomii+PosPl: gimakomiiiwaa
     +Px2makomii+PosObv: gimakomiiini
     +Px3makomii+Pos1Pl: omakomiiinaan
     +Px3makomii+PosPl: omakomiiiwaa
     +Px3makomii+PosObv: omakomiiini
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos1Pl: imakomiiinaan
     +PxIndefmakomii+PosPl: imakomiiiwaa
     +PxIndefmakomii+PosObv: imakomiiini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1makomii+Pret: nimakomiiiban
     +Px1makomii+VocPl: nimakomii***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Pret: gimakomiiiban
     +Px2makomii+VocPl: gimakomii***idig, idog***
     +Px3makomii+Pret: omakomiiiban
     +Px3makomii+VocPl: omakomii***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pret: imakomiiiban
     +PxIndefmakomii+VocPl: imakomii***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1makomii+Obv: nimakomiian
     +Px1makomii+Pl: nimakomiiag
     +Px1makomii+Loc: nimakomiiing
     +Px2makomii+Obv: gimakomiian
     +Px2makomii+Pl: gimakomiiag
     +Px2makomii+Loc: gimakomiiing
     +Px3makomii+Obv: omakomiian
     +Px3makomii+Pl: omakomiiag
     +Px3makomii+Loc: omakomiiing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Obv: imakomiian
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pl: imakomiiag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Loc: imakomiiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     makomii+Dim+Pos: makomiiensim
     makomii+Con+Pos: makomiienhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     makomii+Dim+Pej: makomiiensish
     makomii+Con+Pej: makomiienhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl: makomiiensinaan
     makomii+Dim+PosPl: makomiiensiwaa
     makomii+Dim+PosObv: makomiiensini
     makomii+Con+Pos1Pl: makomiienhinaan
     makomii+Con+PosPl: makomiienhiwaa
     makomii+Con+PosObv: makomiienhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     makomii+Dim+Pret: makomiiensiban
     makomii+Dim+VocPl: makomiiens***idig, idog***
     makomii+Con+Pret: makomiienhiban
     makomii+Con+VocPl: makomiienh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     makomii+Dim+Obv: makomiiensan
     makomii+Dim+Pl: makomiiensag
     makomii+Dim+Loc: makomiiensing
     makomii+Con+Obv: makomiienhan
     makomii+Con+Pl: makomiienhag
     makomii+Con+Loc: makomiienhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     makomii+Pos+Pej: makomiiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl: makomiiiminaan
     makomii+Pos+PosPl: makomiiimiwaa
     makomii+Pos+PosObv: makomiiimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     makomii+Pos+Pret: makomiiimiban
     makomii+Pos+VocPl: makomiiim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     makomii+Pos+Obv: makomiiiman
     makomii+Pos+Pl: makomiiimag
     makomii+Pos+Loc: makomiiiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl: makomiiishinaan
     makomii+Pej+PosPl: makomiiishiwaa
     makomii+Pej+PosObv: makomiiishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     makomii+Pej+Pret: makomiiishiban
     makomii+Pej+VocPl: makomiiish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     makomii+Pej+Obv: makomiiishan
     makomii+Pej+Pl: makomiiishag
     makomii+Pej+Loc: makomiiishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     makomii+Pos1Pl+Pret: makomiiinaaniban
     makomii+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makomiiinaan***idig, idog***
     makomii+PosPl+Pret: makomiiiwaaiban
     makomii+PosPl+VocPl: makomiiiwaa***idig, idog***
     makomii+PosObv+Pret: makomiiiniiban
     makomii+PosObv+VocPl: makomiiini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     makomii+Pos1Pl+Obv: makomiiinaanan
     makomii+Pos1Pl+Pl: makomiiinaanag
     makomii+Pos1Pl+Loc: makomiiinaaning
     makomii+PosPl+Obv: makomiiiwaaan
     makomii+PosPl+Pl: makomiiiwaaag
     makomii+PosPl+Loc: makomiiiwaaing
     makomii+PosObv+Obv: makomiiinian
     makomii+PosObv+Pl: makomiiiniag
     makomii+PosObv+Loc: makomiiiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     makomii+Pret+Obv: makomiiibanan
     makomii+Pret+Pl: makomiiibanag
     makomii+Pret+Loc: makomiiibaning
     makomii+VocPl+Obv: makomii***idig, idog***an
     makomii+VocPl+Pl: makomii***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+VocPl+Loc: makomii***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos: nimakomiiensim
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos: nimakomiienhim
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos: gimakomiiensim
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos: gimakomiienhim
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pos: omakomiiensim
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pos: omakomiienhim
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos: imakomiiensim
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos: imakomiienhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pej: nimakomiiensish
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pej: nimakomiienhish
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pej: gimakomiiensish
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pej: gimakomiienhish
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pej: omakomiiensish
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pej: omakomiienhish
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pej: imakomiiensish
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pej: imakomiienhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl: nimakomiiensinaan
     +Px1makomii+Dim+PosPl: nimakomiiensiwaa
     +Px1makomii+Dim+PosObv: nimakomiiensini
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos1Pl: nimakomiienhinaan
     +Px1makomii+Con+PosPl: nimakomiienhiwaa
     +Px1makomii+Con+PosObv: nimakomiienhini
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl: gimakomiiensinaan
     +Px2makomii+Dim+PosPl: gimakomiiensiwaa
     +Px2makomii+Dim+PosObv: gimakomiiensini
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos1Pl: gimakomiienhinaan
     +Px2makomii+Con+PosPl: gimakomiienhiwaa
     +Px2makomii+Con+PosObv: gimakomiienhini
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl: omakomiiensinaan
     +Px3makomii+Dim+PosPl: omakomiiensiwaa
     +Px3makomii+Dim+PosObv: omakomiiensini
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pos1Pl: omakomiienhinaan
     +Px3makomii+Con+PosPl: omakomiienhiwaa
     +Px3makomii+Con+PosObv: omakomiienhini
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos1Pl: imakomiiensinaan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+PosPl: imakomiiensiwaa
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+PosObv: imakomiiensini
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos1Pl: imakomiienhinaan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+PosPl: imakomiienhiwaa
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+PosObv: imakomiienhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pret: nimakomiiensiban
     +Px1makomii+Dim+VocPl: nimakomiiens***idig, idog***
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pret: nimakomiienhiban
     +Px1makomii+Con+VocPl: nimakomiienh***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pret: gimakomiiensiban
     +Px2makomii+Dim+VocPl: gimakomiiens***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pret: gimakomiienhiban
     +Px2makomii+Con+VocPl: gimakomiienh***idig, idog***
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pret: omakomiiensiban
     +Px3makomii+Dim+VocPl: omakomiiens***idig, idog***
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pret: omakomiienhiban
     +Px3makomii+Con+VocPl: omakomiienh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pret: imakomiiensiban
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+VocPl: imakomiiens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pret: imakomiienhiban
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+VocPl: imakomiienh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Obv: nimakomiiensan
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pl: nimakomiiensag
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Loc: nimakomiiensing
     +Px1makomii+Con+Obv: nimakomiienhan
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pl: nimakomiienhag
     +Px1makomii+Con+Loc: nimakomiienhing
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Obv: gimakomiiensan
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pl: gimakomiiensag
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Loc: gimakomiiensing
     +Px2makomii+Con+Obv: gimakomiienhan
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pl: gimakomiienhag
     +Px2makomii+Con+Loc: gimakomiienhing
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Obv: omakomiiensan
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pl: omakomiiensag
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Loc: omakomiiensing
     +Px3makomii+Con+Obv: omakomiienhan
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pl: omakomiienhag
     +Px3makomii+Con+Loc: omakomiienhing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Obv: imakomiiensan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pl: imakomiiensag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Loc: imakomiiensing
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Obv: imakomiienhan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pl: imakomiienhag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Loc: imakomiienhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1makomii+Pos+Pej: nimakomiiimish
     +Px2makomii+Pos+Pej: gimakomiiimish
     +Px3makomii+Pos+Pej: omakomiiimish
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos+Pej: imakomiiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl: nimakomiiiminaan
     +Px1makomii+Pos+PosPl: nimakomiiimiwaa
     +Px1makomii+Pos+PosObv: nimakomiiimini
     +Px2makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl: gimakomiiiminaan
     +Px2makomii+Pos+PosPl: gimakomiiimiwaa
     +Px2makomii+Pos+PosObv: gimakomiiimini
     +Px3makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl: omakomiiiminaan
     +Px3makomii+Pos+PosPl: omakomiiimiwaa
     +Px3makomii+Pos+PosObv: omakomiiimini
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos+Pos1Pl: imakomiiiminaan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos+PosPl: imakomiiimiwaa
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos+PosObv: imakomiiimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1makomii+Pos+Pret: nimakomiiimiban
     +Px1makomii+Pos+VocPl: nimakomiiim***idig, idog***
     +Px2makomii+Pos+Pret: gimakomiiimiban
     +Px2makomii+Pos+VocPl: gimakomiiim***idig, idog***
     +Px3makomii+Pos+Pret: omakomiiimiban
     +Px3makomii+Pos+VocPl: omakomiiim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos+Pret: imakomiiimiban
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos+VocPl: imakomiiim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1makomii+Pos+Obv: nimakomiiiman
     +Px1makomii+Pos+Pl: nimakomiiimag
     +Px1makomii+Pos+Loc: nimakomiiiming
     +Px2makomii+Pos+Obv: gimakomiiiman
     +Px2makomii+Pos+Pl: gimakomiiimag
     +Px2makomii+Pos+Loc: gimakomiiiming
     +Px3makomii+Pos+Obv: omakomiiiman
     +Px3makomii+Pos+Pl: omakomiiimag
     +Px3makomii+Pos+Loc: omakomiiiming
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos+Obv: imakomiiiman
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos+Pl: imakomiiimag
     +PxIndefmakomii+Pos+Loc: imakomiiiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimakomiiishinaan
     +Px1makomii+Pej+PosPl: nimakomiiishiwaa
     +Px1makomii+Pej+PosObv: nimakomiiishini
     +Px2makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimakomiiishinaan
     +Px2makomii+Pej+PosPl: gimakomiiishiwaa
     +Px2makomii+Pej+PosObv: gimakomiiishini
     +Px3makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl: omakomiiishinaan
     +Px3makomii+Pej+PosPl: omakomiiishiwaa
     +Px3makomii+Pej+PosObv: omakomiiishini
